Utah statutes.
53C-2-402.   Mineral leases -- Director to establish rules for mineral leases -- Revenues to be deposited in Land Grant Management Fund.

(1)  Mineral leases of all trust lands owned by the state shall be made exclusively by the director, under rules made by the director.

(2)  Revenues from mineral leases of trust lands shall be deposited in the Land Grant Management Fund.



Enacted by Chapter 294, 1994 General Session

